pl: Typ mocowania przycisku: Zestaw do powlekania guzików; Uchwyt pętelkowy; Nit/guzik dżinsowy; Przyszywany (2 dziurki); Przyszywany (4 dziurki); Przyszywany (z wieloma dziurkami); Stopka; Zatrzask (w stylu guzika); Kołek; Inne
sv: Typ av knapp: Klädda knappar (kit); Öglefot; Nit-/jeansknapp; Genomsydd (2 hål); Genomsydd (4 hål); Genomsydd (flera hål); Knappfot; Tryckknapp (knappstil); Duffelknapp; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação do botão: Kit de botões para forrar (auto-forrável); Haste de alça; Botão de rebite/jeans; Com furos passantes (2 furos); Com furos passantes (4 furos); Com furos passantes (vários furos); Haste; Botão de pressão (estilo botão); Botão alamar (toggle); Outro
en: Button attachment type: Cover button kit (self-cover); Loop shank; Rivet/jeans button; Sew-through (2-hole); Sew-through (4-hole); Sew-through (multiple holes); Shank; Snap-on stud (button-style); Toggle; Other
es: Tipo de sujeción de botón: Kit de botones para forrar (autoforrado); Tallo con ojal; Remache/botón para jeans; Para coser (2 agujeros); Para coser (4 agujeros); Para coser (múltiples agujeros); Tallo; Remache a presión (estilo botón); Alamar; Otro
th: ประเภทการติดกระดุม: ชุดทำกระดุมปั๊ม (หุ้มเอง); ก้านห่วง; หมุดย้ำ/กระดุมยีนส์; เย็บทะลุ (2 รู); เย็บทะลุ (4 รู); เย็บทะลุ (หลายรู); ก้านกระดุม; กระดุมแป๊ก (ทรงกระดุม); กระดุมต็อกเกิล; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de fixation par bouton: Kit de boutons à recouvrir (à recouvrir soi-même); Tige à boucle; Rivet/bouton de jean; À coudre (2 trous); À coudre (4 trous); À coudre (trous multiples); À tige; Goujon à clipser (style bouton); Brandebourg; Autre
fi: Napin kiinnitystyyppi: Päällystettävä nappipakkaus (itse päällystettävä); Lenkkikanta; Niitti- / farkkunappi; Läpiommeltava (2-reikäinen); Läpiommeltava (4-reikäinen); Läpiommeltava (useita reikiä); Kanta; Painonappi (nappityylinen); Puikkonappi; Muu
de: Knopf-Befestigungsart: Überzieh-Knopf-Paket (zum Selbstbeziehen); Öse; Niet-/Jeansknopf; Annähknopf (2 Löcher); Annähknopf (4 Löcher); Annähknopf (mehrere Löcher); Stiel; Druckknopf (Knopf-Stil); Knebel; Sonstige
cs: Způsob uchycení knoflíku: Sada na potahování knoflíků; Smyčkové ouško; Nýtovací/džínový knoflík; Přišívací (2 dírky); Přišívací (4 dírky); Přišívací (více dírek); S ouškem; Nacvakávací (knoflíkový styl); Olivka; Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja gumba: Komplet za presvlačenje gumba; Gumb s omčicom; Zakovica / gumb za traperice; Za prišivanje (2 rupe); Za prišivanje (4 rupe); Za prišivanje (više rupa); Nožica; Pritisni (u obliku gumba); Duguljasti gumb; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu đính khuy: Bộ nút bọc vải (tự bọc); Chân nút dạng vòng; Nút đinh tán/nút quần jean; Nút xuyên lỗ (2 lỗ); Nút xuyên lỗ (4 lỗ); Nút xuyên lỗ (nhiều lỗ); Nút có chân; Đinh tán cài (kiểu nút); Nút khuy mắc; Khác
hu: Gomb rögzítési típusa: Bevonható gombkészlet; Füles gomb; Farmergomb/szegecses gomb; Felvarrható (2 lyukú); Felvarrható (4 lyukú); Felvarrható (több lyukú); Füles; Patentgomb; Bujtatógomb; Egyéb
tr: Düğme ekleme tipi: Kaplama düğme kiti (kendi kendine kaplama); Halka sap; Perçin/kot düğmesi; Dikmeli (2 delikli); Dikmeli (4 delikli); Dikmeli (çok delikli); Sap; Çıtçıt (düğme stili); Çoban düğme; Diğer
zh-CN: 纽扣固定类型: 包布扣套件（自包）; 环状扣柄; 铆钉/牛仔扣; 穿孔式（2 孔）; 穿孔式（4 孔）; 穿孔式（多孔）; 带柄式; 按扣式螺钉（纽扣款）; 牛角扣; 其他
lt-LT: Mygtuko tvirtinimo tipas: Aptraukiamų sagų rinkinys; Kilpelė; Kniedė / džinsų saga; Prisiuvama (su 2 skylutėmis); Prisiuvama (su 4 skylutėmis); Prisiuvama (su keliomis skylutėmis); Su kojele; Spaudė (sagos formos); Pailga saga; Kita
el: Τύπος στερέωσης κουμπιού: Κιτ επικάλυψης κουμπιών (αυτοεπικαλυπτόμενα); Κοτσάνι με θηλιά; Πριτσίνι/κουμπί τζιν; Ραφτό (2 οπών); Ραφτό (4 οπών); Ραφτό (πολλαπλών οπών); Κοτσάνι; Τρουκ (σε στιλ κουμπιού); Μοντγκόμερι; Άλλο
ru: Тип крепления пуговицы: Набор для обтяжки пуговиц (под обтяжку); Петелька; Джинсовая пуговица на заклепке; Прокольная (2 отверстия); Прокольная (4 отверстия); Прокольная (несколько отверстий); На ножке; Кнопка (в виде пуговицы); Клевант; Другое
it: Tipo di fissaggio del bottone: Kit per bottoni ricoperti (fai da te); Gambo a occhiello; Rivetto/bottone per jeans; Da cucire (2 fori); Da cucire (4 fori); Da cucire (più fori); Gambo; Perno a pressione (a bottone); Alamaro; Altro
nb: Festetype for knapp: Trekk-selv-knappesett; Løkkefeste; Nagle/jeansknapp; Gjennomsying (2 hull); Gjennomsying (4 hull); Gjennomsying (flere hull); Stilk; Trykknapp-nagle (knappestil); Knebel; Annet
ko: 단추 부착 유형: 싸개 단추 키트(셀프 커버); 루프 섕크; 리벳/청바지 단추; 구멍 단추(2홀); 구멍 단추(4홀); 구멍 단추(다중 홀); 섕크; 스냅온 스터드(단추형); 토글; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do botão: Kit de botões para forrar (forro próprio); Pé de argola; Botão de rebite/ganga; Para coser (2 furos); Para coser (4 furos); Para coser (múltiplos furos); Pé; Mola de pressão (estilo botão); Alamar; Outro
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia tlačidla: Súprava na potiahnutie gombíkov; Gombík s uškom; Nitovaný/džínsový gombík; Na prišitie (2 dierky); Na prišitie (4 dierky); Na prišitie (viac dierok); S uškom; Nacvakávací (vzhľad gombíka); Olivka; Iné
zh-TW: 鈕扣固定類型: 包布釦工具包 (自行包覆); 環狀腳釦; 鉚釘/牛仔褲鈕扣; 縫透釦 (雙孔); 縫透釦 (四孔); 縫透釦 (多孔); 腳釦; 按扣 (鈕扣款式); 牛角釦; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de fixare al nasturelui: Kit pentru nasturi îmbrăcați (de îmbrăcat singur); Picioruș cu buclă; Nit/nasture pentru blugi; Cu coasere prin găuri (2 găuri); Cu coasere prin găuri (4 găuri); Cu coasere prin găuri (mai multe găuri); Cu picioruș; Capsă tip buton (stil nasture); Nasture tip brandeburg; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve gumba: Komplet za gumb (samostojna prevleka); Zanka; Kovičen/jeans gumb; Za prišitje (2 luknji); Za prišitje (4 luknje); Za prišitje (več lukenj); Pecelj; Pritiskač (v obliki gumba); Zatič; Drugo
da: Fastgørelsestype for knap: Knapovertrækssæt (selvovertræk); Øsken; Nitte-/jeansknap; Til isyning (2 huller); Til isyning (4 huller); Til isyning (flere huller); Med stilk; Trykknapnitte (knapstil); Knebel; Andet
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на копчето: Комплект за обличане на копчета; Ухо; Нит/копче за дънки; За пришиване (2 дупки); За пришиване (4 дупки); За пришиване (множество дупки); Краче; Тик-так (тип копче); Продълговато (морско); Други
nl: Type knoopbevestiging: Knoopbekledingskit (zelf bekleden); Knoop met oog; Klinknagel-/jeansknoop; Aannaai (2-gaats); Aannaai (4-gaats); Aannaai (meerdere gaten); Oogknoop; Drukknop (knoopstijl); Knevelknoop; Overig
ja: ボタンアタッチメントタイプ: くるみボタンキット (セルフカバー); ループシャンク; リベット/ジーンズボタン; 糸通し (2つ穴); 糸通し (4つ穴); 糸通し (複数穴); シャンク; スナップオンスタッド (ボタンスタイル); トグル; その他